Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERALLY

§54-1 Improvement by assessment. Any
other law to the contrary notwithstanding, any county may construct water
systems by use of the improvement by assessment method, provided that nothing
herein shall be construed to prevent any county or board of water supply from
constructing the improvements with its own funds. [L 1963, c 134, §1; Supp,
§138-70; HRS §54-1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next